src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! !!!Numerals
!! Numerals are morphologically nominals, only exception to noun inflection
!! is that they form compounds with special agreeing patterns. Syntactically
!! and semantically numerals are clearly separate subset of nominals. Some
!! of the numerals stem variation patterns are rare to non-existent for other
!! nominal types. Numerals have two subclasses, cardinals and ordinals.

! TODO: unimpl.
LEXICON NUM 
!! Numerals have been split in three sections, the compounding parts
!! of cardinals and ordinals, and the non-compounding ones:
!!€gt-norm: Numeral
!!€ kaksikymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Sg+Par ! 23,000
!!€ kahdessadasneljäs: kahdes+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom#sadas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom#neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom  ! 204rd
!!€ viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä  ! 50-ish
0    NUM_CARD_ALL    ;
0    NUM_ORD_ALL ;
0    NUM_OTHERS  ;

 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;          ! for the arabic numerals        !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals         !
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.                   !
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                     !

LEXICON NUM_OTHERS
!! There is a set of numbers or corresponding expressions that work like them,
!! but are not basic cardinals or ordinals:
!!€gt-norm: Numeral others
!!€ viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä
!!€ puolikymmentä: puolikymmentä+Num+Sg+Nom
yksisen+Num#:yksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kaksisen+Num#:kaksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
yhtisen+Num#:yhtisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kahtisen+Num#:kahtisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kolmisen+Num#:kolmisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
nelisen+Num#:nelisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
viitisen+Num#:viitisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kuutisen+Num#:kuutisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
seitsemisen+Num#:seitsemisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kahdeksisen+Num#:kahdeksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
yhdeksisen+Num#:yhdeksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
pari+Num:par           NUM_PARI ;

!! !!Numeral stem variation
!! Numerals follow the same stem variation patterns as nouns, some of these
!! being very rare to extinct for nouns. 
LEXICON NUM_YKSI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 31
!!€ yksi: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ yhtheen: yksi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ yhtenä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ yhđessä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ yhtä: yksi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ yksii: yksi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ yksiin: yksi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ ykshiin: yksi+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksissä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ine
0:ksi   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:hthe  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:hte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hđe   NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:h     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 31 back§
!!€ kaksi: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kahtheen: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kahtena: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kahđessa: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kahta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kaksii: kaksi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kaksiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kakshiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksissa: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ine
0:ksi   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:ks   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:hthe  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:hte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hđe   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:h     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 8~5
!!€ kolme: kolme+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kolmheen: kolme+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kolmena: kolme+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kolmessa: kolme+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kolmee: kolme+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kolmii: kolme+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kolmiin: kolme+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kolmhiin: kolme+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kolmina: kolme+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kolmissa: kolme+Num+Pl+Ine
0:e     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:he    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_E ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS ; 

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄ
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 10
!!€ nelje: nelje+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ neljee: nelje+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ neljheen: nelje+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ neljenä: nelje+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ neljessä: nelje+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ neljii: nelje+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ neljiin: nelje+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ neljhiin: nelje+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ neljinä: nelje+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ neljissä: nelje+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ neljäin: nelje+Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare ! (Ei ole olemassa kveeniksi) 
0:e  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_E   ;
0:he NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN    ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_VIISI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 27 front
!!€ viisi: viisi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ viitheen: viisi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ viitenä: viisi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ viiđessä: viisi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ viisinä: viisi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ viisissä: viisi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ viittä: viisi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ viissii: viisi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ viissiin: viisi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ viishiin: viisi+Num+Pl+Ill
0:si    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:the    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:te    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:đe    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_KUUSI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 27 back
!!€ kuusi: kuusi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kuutena: kuusi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kuuđessa: kuusi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kuusina: kuusi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kuusissa: kuusi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ kuutta: kuusi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kuussii: kuusi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kuussiin: kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kuushiin: kuusi+Num+Pl+Ill
0:si    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:the    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:te    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:đe    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;


LEXICON NUM_KAHDEKSAN
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 10n
!!€ kahđeksen: kahđeksen+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kahđeksee: kahđeksen+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kahđeksheen: kahđeksen+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kahđeksessa: kahđeksen+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kahđeksenna: kahđeksen+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kahđeksii: kahđeksen+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kahđeksiita: kahđeken+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kahđeksiitten: kahđeksen+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kahđekshiin: kahđeksen+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kahđeksissa: kahđeksen+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ kahđeksinna: kahđeksen+Num+Pl+Ess
0:en    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_YHDEKSÄN
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 10n front
!!€ yhđeksen: yhđeksen+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ yhđeksee: yhđeksen+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ yhđeksheen: yhđeksen+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ yhđeksessä: yhđeksen+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ yhđeksennä: yhđeksen+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ yhđeksii: yhđeksen+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ yhđeksiitä: yhđeksen+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ yhđeksiitten: yhđeksen+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ yhđekshiin: yhđeksen+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ yhđeksissä: yhđeksen+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ yhđeksinnä: yhđeksen+Num+Pl+Ess
0:en    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä    ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN    ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_CARD_ALL
yksi+Num:y             NUM_YKSI  ;
kaksi+Num:ka           NUM_KAKSI ;
kolme+Num:kolm         NUM_KOLME ;
nelje+Num:nelj         NUM_NELJÄ ;
viisi+Num:vii          NUM_VIISI ;
kuusi+Num:kuu          NUM_KUUSI ;
seittemen+Num+Err/Orth:seitsem  NUM_YHDEKSÄN ;
seittemen+Num:seittem  NUM_YHDEKSÄN ;
kahđeksen+Num:kahđeks  NUM_KAHDEKSAN ;
yhđeksen+Num:yhđeks    NUM_YHDEKSÄN ;
seitsämän+Err/Orth+Num:seitsäm  NUM_YHDEKSÄN    ;
